Illinois, session 104th, SB839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Employment First Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 40/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Employment First Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-91, eff. 7-16-13.)